Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4523
Trust for care of animal.

(a) In this section:

(1) Animal trust means a trust or an interest in a trust created to provide for the care of one or more animals.

(2) Protector means a person appointed in an animal trust to enforce the trust on behalf of the animal or, if no such person is appointed in the trust, a person appointed by the court for that purpose.

(b) The decanting power may be exercised over an animal trust that has a protector to the extent the trust could be decanted under the Uniform Trust Decanting Act if each animal that benefits from the trust were an individual, if the protector consents in a signed record to the exercise of the power.

(c) A protector for an animal has the rights under the act of a qualified beneficiary.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the act, if a first trust is an animal trust, in an exercise of the decanting power, the second trust must provide that trust property may be applied only to its intended purpose for the period the first trust benefited the animal.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 33.